Georgia, session 2025_26, HB657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to mental health, is amended in
Chapter 1, relating to governing and regulation of mental health, by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"37-1-8.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Certification training body' means an entity approved by the department to provide
training and testing for certified peer specialists in accordance with department policy.
H. B. 657
- 1 -

LC 52 0794
(2) 'Certified peer specialist' means an individual who is trained and certified to provide
ongoing support to individuals and their families receiving mental health or substance use
recovery supports and services. Such individual works from the perspective of his or her
lived experience and helps build environments conducive to recovery, promoting hope,
personal responsibility, empowerment, education, and self-determination in the
communities served. Such term means the following certified peer specialist designations
recognized by the department:
(A) Certified Peer Specialist-Mental Health or CPS-MH, a certified peer specialist who
has lived experience with a mental health condition and is practicing recovery related
to such condition;
(B) Certified Peer Specialist-Addictive Disease or CPS-AD, a certified peer specialist
who has lived experience with an addictive disease and is practicing recovery related
to such disease;
(C) Certified Peer Specialist-Youth or CPS-Y, a certified peer specialist between the
ages of 18 and 30 who has lived experience with a mental health condition or substance
use disorder and is practicing recovery related to such condition or disorder;
(D) Certified Peer Specialist-Parent or CPS-P, a certified peer specialist who is a parent
or legal guardian who has lived experience raising a young person with either a mental
health condition or substance use disorder and has supported such person in recovery,
provided that such parent or legal guardian has a permanent relationship of at least three
years with such person; and
(E) Other ancillary peer credentials, such as Whole Health and Wellness Coach or
Forensic Peer Mentors, which may be added to a certified peer specialist designation
as determined by the department only.
(3) 'Peer support services' means services rendered to individuals in need of support that
are provided by a certified peer specialist. Such term includes, but is not limited to,
individual peer recovery coaching, group peer check-ins, advocacy, mutual aid support
H. B. 657
- 2 -

LC 52 0794
groups, connection to treatment services, harm reduction services, connection to
medication for substance use disorder or alcohol use disorder, housing support,
transportation support, food insecurity support, acquiring identification, job placement,
or connections to other resources within the community.
(4) 'Recovery community organization for substance use' means an independent
nonprofit organization led and governed by representatives of local communities of
recovery from substance use disorders that helps individuals, families, and communities
in increasing access to peer support services, advocacy efforts for recovery, and
community education around addiction and recovery.
(5) 'State-wide recovery community organization' means the one organization designated
by the department to work with communities and organizations in determining
recognition as a local recovery community organization for substance use.
(b) Peer specialists working in department services are required to be certified by the
department.
(c) Only the department shall certify individuals completing training and testing provided
by certification training bodies.
(d) Recovery community organizations for substance use shall:
(1) Have a mission primarily focused on supporting recovery from substance use
disorders and related challenges but may support individuals in all forms of recovery;
(2) Be a nonprofit organization or established under a nonprofit organization;
(3) Have an operating board, a majority of whose members shall be in recovery from
substance use disorders, or have an advisory board, a majority of whose members shall
be in recovery from substance use disorders and the remainder shall be members of the
recovery community, including people in recovery, family members of those affected by
addiction, and recovery allies and advocates;
(4) Provide nonclinical peer support services;
(5) Employ certified peer specialists to provide peer support services;
H. B. 657
- 3 -

LC 52 0794
(6) Be supportive of all pathways to recovery, including the utilization of medication for
substance use disorders or alcohol use disorders and harm reduction services;
(7) Be accountable to the recovery community through participatory processes that
promote involvement, engagement, and consultation of people in recovery and their
families, friends, and allies; and
(8) Communicate and cooperate with the state-wide recovery community organization
and the department.
(e) Subject to appropriations, the department shall designate a state-wide recovery
community organization to act as the coordinator for the state-wide recovery community
organization network."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 657
- 4 -